Missouri, session 2026, HB3486.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 227, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 227.911, to read as follows:
227.911. The portion of U.S. Highway 61 from CRD R7 School Road continuing
2 north to CRD Plattin Road in Jefferson County shall be designated the "Army PFC
3 Gary Prather Memorial Highway". The department of transportation shall erect and
4 maintain appropriate signs designating such highway, with the costs to be paid by the
5 department of transportation.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.